Massachusetts, session 194th, H3237.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 62, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by striking out, in lines 304 and 305, the words “; provided, however, that the 
individual itemizes deductions on his federal income tax return”. 
SECTION 2. The department of revenue shall promulgate regulations necessary to 
implement and administer this act.